Missouri, session 2026, SB1607.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 301.472, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 301.472,
to read as follows:
301.472. 1. Any motor vehicle owner may receive
special license plates for any motor vehicle the person
owns, either solely or jointly, other than an apportioned
motor vehicle or a commercial motor vehicle licensed in
excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight as
prescribed in this section after an annual payment of an
emblem-use authorization fee to a professional sports team
which has made an agreement pursuant to subsection 5 of this
section. For the purposes of this section a "professional
sports team" shall mean an organization located in this
state franchised by the National Professional Soccer League,
the National Women's Soccer League, the National Football
League, the National Basketball Association, the Women's
National Basketball Association, the National Hockey League,
the International Hockey League, or the American League or
the National League of Major League Baseball or a team
playing in Major League Soccer.
2. The professional sports team which has made an
agreement pursuant to subsection 5 of this section and which
receives the emblem-use authorization fee hereby authorizes
the use of its official emblem to be affixed on multiyear
1

personalized license plates as provided in this section.
Any vehicle owner may annually apply for the use of the
emblem. The director of revenue shall not authorize the
manufacturer of the material to produce such license plates
with the individual seal, logo, or emblem until the
department of revenue receives a minimum of one hundred
applications for each specific professional sports team.
3. Upon annual application and payment of a thirty-
five dollar emblem-use contribution to the professional
sports team such team shall issue to the vehicle owner,
without further charge, an emblem-use authorization
statement, which shall be presented by the owner to the
director of the department of revenue at the time of
registration of a motor vehicle. Upon presentation of the
annual statement and payment of a fifteen dollar fee in
addition to the regular registration fees, and presentation
of other documents which may be required by law, the
director shall issue a personalized license plate, which
shall bear the official emblem of the professional sports
team in a manner determined by the director. Such license
plates shall be made with fully reflective material with a
common color scheme and design, shall be clearly visible at
night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed
by section 301.130. A fee for the issuance of personalized
license plates issued pursuant to section 301.144 shall not
be required for plates issued pursuant to this section.
4. A vehicle owner, who was previously issued a plate
with a professional sports team emblem authorized by this
section but who does not provide an emblem-use authorization
statement at a subsequent time of registration, shall be
issued a new plate which does not bear the professional
sports team emblem, as otherwise provided by law.
2

5. The director of the department of revenue is
authorized to make agreements with professional sports teams
on behalf of the state which allow the use of any such
team's official emblem pursuant to the provisions of this
section as consideration for receiving a thirty-five dollar
emblem-use contribution.
6. Except as provided in subsection 7 of this section,
a professional sports team receiving a thirty-five dollar
contribution shall forward such contribution, less an amount
not in excess of five percent of the contribution for the
costs of administration, to the Jackson County Sports
Authority or the St. Louis Regional Convention and Visitors
Commission. The moneys shall be administered as follows:
(1) The sports authority may retain not in excess of
five percent of all funds forwarded to it pursuant to this
section for the costs of administration and shall expend the
remaining balance of such funds, after consultation with a
professional sports team within the authority's area, on
marketing and promoting such team. The amount of money
expended from the funds obtained pursuant to this section by
the authority per professional sports team shall be in the
same proportion to the total funds available to be expended
on such team as the proportion of contributions forwarded by
the team to the authority is to the total contributions
received by the authority;
(2) The regional convention and visitors commission
shall hold the revenues received from the professional
sports teams in the St. Louis area in separate accounts for
each team. Each team may submit an annual marketing plan to
the commission. Expenses of a team which are in accordance
with the marketing plan shall be reimbursed by the
commission as long as moneys are available in the account.
The commission may retain not in excess of five percent for
3

the costs of administration. If no marketing plan is
submitted by a team, the commission shall market and promote
the team.
7. (1) The Kansas City Chiefs shall forward all
emblem-use fees received, less an amount not in excess of
five percent of the costs of administration, to the Chiefs'
Children's Fund, a not-for-profit fund established to
benefit children in need in the Kansas City area.
(2) The Kansas City Current shall forward all emblem-
use fees received, less an amount not in excess of five
percent of the costs of administration, to the Kansas City
Current Foundation or a team designated not-for-profit that
benefits youth in the Kansas City area.
8. The director of the department of revenue shall
promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
pursuant to the authority of this section shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536.
4